Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.44 RCW to read as follows:The department is directed to adopt and maintain agency policies that:(1) Proactively provide utility owners with information about planned state highway fish barrier removal projects to enable collaboration between utility owners and the department, with at least one year of advance notice whenever feasible;(2) Maximize the amount of federal funding for fish barrier removal projects that also allow the funds to be used for utility relocation costs by the department or utilities under federal rules and regulations. The department is encouraged to:(a) Ensure that if utility relocation costs are an eligible use under federal rules and regulations, any awards received are deposited into the multimodal transportation account; and(b) Report to the legislature and office of financial management on any recommendations for changes to state law, rules, or policies that would allow the department or utilities to more efficiently receive competitive federal grant funding or reimbursements for utility relocation to the extent permitted by the terms of federal programs and applicable federal regulations.--- END ---